Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-701
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-701 to 38-711 shall be known and may be cited as the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act.

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 73;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1728;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 231.